Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.05
Clerk of the district court; deposits; limitation.

The deposits secured by a surety bond shall at no time exceed the amount of the penal sum of such surety bond.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 5, p. 870;

Laws 1988, LB 703, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 34.